Wisconsin, session 2025, AB858.
do enact as follows:AB858,11Section 1. 196.025 (1h) of the statutes is created to read:AB858,2,22196.025 (1h) Social cost of carbon emissions. (a) In this subsection: AB858,2,331. “Renewable resource” has the meaning given in s. 196.378 (1) (h).AB858,2,842. “Social cost of carbon” means an estimate, in dollars, representing the 5damage to the environment that would be incurred by the emission from human 6activity of one additional metric ton of carbon dioxide, as calculated by the most 7recent scientific and economic advances in such a calculation, as determined by the 8commission, but not less than $185 per metric ton of carbon dioxide.AB858,2,109(b) The commission shall consider the social cost of carbon in determining 10whether to issue certificates under ss. 196.49 and 196.491 (3).AB858,2,1411(c) The commission shall ensure in rate-making orders that any costs for 12infrastructure necessary to expand the production and distribution of energy 13produced using fossil fuels may be recovered only from customers that receive the 14primary benefit of that infrastructure.AB858,2,1715(d) The commission shall ensure in rate-making orders that any costs 16incurred in transitioning from producing energy using fossil fuels to producing 17energy using renewable resources are not recovered from any customer.AB858,218Section 2. Initial applicability.AB858,3,21(1) The treatment of s. 196.025 (1h) (b), (c), and (d) first applies to applications 2for certificates that are received on the effective date of this subsection.AB858,3,33